Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-209 General casualty insurance
defined. General casualty insurance includes vehicle insurance as defined
in section 431:1-208, and accident and health or sickness insurance as defined
in section 431:1-205 when issued as an incidental coverage with or supplemental
to liability insurance. In addition, general casualty insurance is insurance:

(1) Against legal liability for the death, injury, or
disability of any human being, or from damage to property;

(2) Of medical, hospital, surgical, and funeral
benefits to persons injured, irrespective of legal liability of the insured,
when issued with or supplemental to insurance against legal liability for the
death, injury, or disability of human beings;

(3) Of the obligation accepted by, imposed upon, or
assumed by employers under law for death, disablement, or injury to employees;

(4) Against loss or damage by burglary, theft,
larceny, robbery, forgery, fraud, vandalism, malicious mischief, confiscation,
or wrongful conversion, disposal, or concealment, or from any attempt of any of
the foregoing; also insurance against loss or damage to moneys, coins, bullion,
securities, notes, drafts, acceptances, or any other valuable papers or
documents, resulting from any cause, except while in the mail;

(5) Upon personal effects of individuals, by an
all-risk type of policy commonly known as the personal property floater;

(6) Against loss or damage to glass and its
appurtenances resulting from any cause;

(7) Against any liability and loss or damage to
property resulting from accidents to or explosions of boilers, pipes, pressure
containers, machinery, or apparatus;

(8) Against loss of or damage to any property of the
insured resulting from the ownership, maintenance, or use of elevators, except
loss or damage by fire;

(9) Against loss or damage to any property caused by
the breakage or leakage of sprinklers, water pipes, or containers, or by water
entering through leaks or openings in buildings;

(10) Against loss or damage resulting from failure of
debtors to pay their obligations to the insured (credit insurance);

(11) Against loss of or damage to any domesticated or
wild animal resulting from any cause (livestock insurance);

(12) Against loss of or damage to any property of the
insured resulting from collision of any other object with such property, but
not including collision to or by vessels, craft, piers, or other
instrumentalities of ocean or inland navigation (collision insurance);

(13) Against legal liability of the insured, and
against loss, damage, or expense incident to a claim of such liability, and
including any obligation of the insured to pay medical, hospital, surgical, and
funeral benefits to injured persons, irrespective of legal liability of the
insured, arising out of the death or injury of any person, or arising out of
injury to the economic interest of any person as the result of negligence in
rendering expert, fiduciary, or professional service (malpractice insurance);

(14) Against any contract of warranty or guaranty
which promises service maintenance, parts replacement, repair, money, or any
other indemnity in the event of loss of or damage to a motor vehicle or any
part thereof from any cause, including loss of or damage to or loss of use of
the motor vehicle by reason of depreciation, deterioration, wear and tear, use,
obsolescence, or breakage if made by a warrantor or guarantor who or which as
such is doing an insurance business; provided that service contracts, as
defined and meeting the requirements of chapter 481X, shall not be subject to
chapter 431.

The doing or proposing to do any business in
substance equivalent to the business described in this section in a manner
designed to evade the provisions of this section is the doing of an insurance
business; and

(15) Against any other kind of loss, damage, or
liability properly the subject of insurance and not within any other class or
classes or type of insurance as defined in sections 431:1-204 to 431:1-211, if
such insurance is not contrary to law or public policy. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2; am L 2000, c 221, §3; am L 2002, c 155, §6; am L 2003, c 212, §14; am L
2014, c 186, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next